Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-107.01
Legal services fee; taxed as costs; when.

A legal services fee of six dollars and twenty-five cents shall be taxed as costs in each case filed in each separate juvenile court and district court, including appeals to such courts, and on each case filed in each county court except those filed in county court pursuant to its jurisdiction under section 25-2802. A legal services fee of six dollars and twenty-five cents shall be taxed as costs for each appeal and original action filed in the Court of Appeals and the Supreme Court. Such fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer on forms prescribed by the State Treasurer within ten days after the close of each month for credit to the Legal Aid and Services Fund.

Laws 1997, LB 729, § 1;

Laws 1998, LB 1041, § 5;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 72;

Laws 2005, LB 348, § 9;

Laws 2016, LB1098, § 1.